District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

38-2973.02

Public School Modernization Advisory Committee functions and coordination with the Director of the Office of Public Education Facilities Modernization.

Repealed.

June 8, 2006, D.C. Law 16-123, § 202, 53 DCR 2843
June 12, 2007, D.C. Law 17-9, § 1010(f), 54 DCR 4102
May 2, 2015, D.C. Law 20-271, § 264(b), 62 DCR 1884
D.C. Law 17-9 rewrote the section.
For temporary (90 days) repeal of this section, see § 264(b) of the New Columbia Statehood Initiative, Omnibus Boards and Commissions, and Election Transition Reform Emergency Amendment Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-481, Nov. 18, 2014, 61 DCR 12133, 20 STAT 4405).
For temporary (90 days) repeal of this section, see § 264(b) of the New Columbia Statehood Initiative, Omnibus Boards and Commissions, and Election Transition Reform Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2015 (D.C. Act 21-7, Feb. 26, 2015, 62 DCR 2646, 21 STAT 807).